Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5285.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-3 of the General Laws entitled "Property Subject to Taxation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-3-70. Municipal taxation on an endowment of a private institution of higher
education.
(a) Each city and town, by ordinance adopted by the city or town council, may wholly or
partially impose a tax, of not more than two percent (2%), on the endowment of a private institution
of higher education that is in excess of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).
(b) All tax revenues generated pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a restricted
receipt account, by the city or town, to be used for the public school district of that municipality.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000786
========